Illinois, session 104th, HB209.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Franchise Tax and License Fee Amnesty Act 5of 2007 is amended by changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 8/5-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Franchise Tax and License Fee Amnesty Act of 2007. References 9in this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 95-233, eff. 8-16-07.)